fi: Pyykinpesuaineen ominaisuudet: Kirkastaja; Värisuojaus; Tiivistetty muoto; Sisältää entsyymejä; Desinfiointiaine; Turvallinen vauvan vaatteille; Turvallinen tummille väreille; Turvallinen herkille; Huuhteluaine; Tahranpoisto; Sopii kylmävesipesuun; Sopii herkälle iholle; Valkoinen pyykki; Muu
hr-HR: Značajke deterdženta za pranje rublja: Posvjetljivač; Zaštita boje; Koncentrirana formula; Sadrži enzime; Sredstvo za dezinfekciju; Sigurno za bebinu odjeću; Sigurno za tamne boje; Sigurno za osjetljive tkanine; Omekšivač; Sredstvo za uklanjanje mrlja; Pogodno za pranje hladnom vodom; Pogodno za osjetljivu kožu; Bijelo rublje; Ostalo
pt-PT: Características do detergente para a roupa: Iluminador; Proteção da cor; Fórmula concentrada; Contém enzimas; Desinfetante; Seguro para roupas de bebé; Seguro para cores escuras; Seguro para roupa delicada; Amaciador; Removedor de manchas; Adequado para lavagem com água fria; Adequado para pele sensível; Lavandaria branca; Outro
th: คุณลักษณะของน้ำยาซักผ้า: สารเพิ่มความสดใส; สำหรับผมทำสี; สูตรเข้มข้น; มีส่วนผสมของเอนไซม์; การฆ่าเชื้อ; ปลอดภัยสำหรับเสื้อผ้าเด็ก; ปลอดภัยสำหรับสีเข้ม; ปลอดภัยสำหรับผ้าบอบบาง; น้ำยาปรับผ้านุ่ม; ขจัดคราบ; เหมาะสำหรับซักน้ำเย็น; เหมาะสำหรับผิวหนังแพ้ง่าย; ซักผ้าขาว; อื่นๆ
sv: Detaljer för tvättmedel: Ljusmedel; Färgskydd; Koncentrerad formula; Innehåller enzymer; Desinfektionsmedel; Säker för babykläder; Säker för mörka färger; Säker för delikatesser; Mjukmedel; Fläckborttagningsmedel; Lämplig för kallvattentvätt; Lämplig för känslig hud; Vittvätt; Övrigt
lt-LT: Skalbiklio savybės: Baltumą paryškinanti priemonė; Spalvų apsauga; Koncentruota formulė; Sudėtyje yra fermentų; Dezinfekcinė priemonė; Saugi kūdikių drabužiams; Saugi tamsioms spalvoms; Saugi ploniems audiniams; Minkštiklis; Dėmių šalinimas; Tinka skalbimui šaltu vandeniu; Tinka jautriai odai; Baltiems skalbiniams; Kita
fr: Caractéristiques du détergent à lessive: Éclaircissant; Protection de la couleur; Formule concentrée; Contient des enzymes; Désinfectant; Sans danger pour les vêtements de bébé; Sans danger pour les couleurs sombres; Sans danger pour les vêtements délicats; Adoucissant; Détachant; Convient au lavage à l’eau froide; Convient aux peaux sensibles; Linge blanc; Autre
es: Características del detergente para la ropa: Abrillantador; Protección del color; Fórmula concentrada; Contiene enzimas; Desinfectante; Seguro para ropa de bebé; Seguro para colores oscuros; Seguro para prendas delicadas; Suavizante; Quitamanchas; Apto para lavado con agua fría; Apto para pieles sensibles; Ropa blanca; Otros
de: Eigenschaften von Waschmitteln: Aufheller; Farbschutz; Konzentrierte Formel; Enthält Enzyme; Desinfektionsmittel; Für Babykleidung geeignet; Für dunkle Farben geeignet; Für Feinwäsche geeignet; Weichspüler; Fleckenentfernung; Geeignet für Kaltwäsche; Geeignet für empfindliche Haut; Weiße Wäsche; Sonstiges
hu: Mosószer jellemzői: Fehérítőszer; Színvédelem; Koncentrált készítmény; Enzimeket tartalmaz; Fertőtlenítő; Bébiruhákhoz használható; Sötét színekhez használható; Kényes ruhákhoz használható; Lágyító; Folteltávolító; Hideg vizes mosásra alkalmas; Érzékeny bőrre alkalmas; Fehér ruhák; Egyéb
pt-BR: Características do sabão em pó: Iluminador; Proteção de cor; Fórmula concentrada; Contém enzimas; Desinfetante; Seguro para roupas de bebê; Seguro para cores escuras; Seguro para delicados; Amaciante; Removedor de manchas; Adequado para lavagem com água fria; Adequado para pele sensível; Lavandaria branca; Outro
nb: Vaskemiddelfunksjoner: Lysemiddel; Fargebeskyttelse; Konsentrert drikk; Inneholder enzymer; Desinfeksjonsmiddel; Trygg for babyklær; Trygg for mørke farger; Trygg for delikatesser; Mykner; Flekkfjerning; Egnet for vask med kaldt vann; Egnet for sensitiv hud; Hvit klesvask; Annet
tr: Çamaşır deterjanı özellikleri: Parlatıcı; Renk koruması; Konsantre formül; Enzimler içerir; Dezenfektan; Bebek kıyafetleri için güvenli; Koyu renkler için güvenli; Hassas ürünler için güvenli; Yumuşatıcı; Leke çıkarıcı; Soğuk suyla yıkamaya uygundur; Hassas ciltler için uygun; Beyaz çamaşır; Diğer
it: Funzionalità del detersivo per bucato: Sbiancante; Protezione del colore; Formula concentrata; Contiene enzimi; Disinfettante; Sicuro per i vestiti del bambino; Sicuro per i colori scuri; Sicuro per i delicati; Ammorbidente; Smacchiatore; Adatto per il lavaggio con acqua fredda; Ideale per le pelli sensibili; Lavanderia bianca; Altro
pl: Charakterystyka detergentów do prania: Rozjaśniacz; Ochrona koloru; Formuła skoncentrowana; Zawiera enzymy; Środki dezynfekujące; Bezpieczny dla ubranek dziecięcych; Bezpieczny dla ciemnych kolorów; Bezpieczny dla delikatnych tkanin; Zmiękczacz; Odplamianie; Odpowiedni do mycia w zimnej wodzie; Odpowiedni do skóry wrażliwej; Pranie białych rzeczy; Inne
cs: Vlastnosti pracího prostředku: Rozjasňovač; Ochrana barev; Koncentrované složení; Obsahuje enzymy; Dezinfekční prostředek; Bezpečné pro kojenecké oblečení; Bezpečné pro tmavé barvy; Bezpečné pro jemné; Změkčovač; Odstraňování skvrn; Vhodné pro mytí studenou vodou; Vhodné pro citlivou pokožku; Bílé prádlo; Jiné
da: Funktioner for vaskepulver: Glansmiddel; Farvebeskyttelse; Koncentreret formel; Indeholder enzymer; Desinfektionsmiddel; Sikker til babytøj; Sikker til mørke farver; Sikker til finvask; Blødgøringsmiddel; Pletfjernelse; Velegnet til koldtvandsvask; Velegnet til følsom hud; Hvid vask; Andet
ro-RO: Caracteristici detergent de rufe: Înălbitor; Protecția culorilor; Formulă concentrată; Conține enzime; Dezinfectant; Sigur pentru hainele bebelușilor; Sigur pentru culori închise; Sigur pentru rufe delicate; Balsam; Îndepărtarea petelor; Potrivit pentru spălarea cu apă rece; Potrivit pentru pielea sensibilă; Rufe albe; Altele
zh-CN: 洗衣粉/液特点: 增亮剂; 颜色保护; 浓缩配方; 含酶; 消毒剂; 适用于婴儿衣物; 适合深色衣物; 适合精细衣物; 柔顺剂; 去除污渍; 适合冷水洗涤; 适合敏感肌肤; 白色衣物; 其他
ko: 세제 기능: 광택제; 색상 유지; 농축 음료; 효소 함유; 살균제; 아기옷에도 안전함; 어두운 색상에도 안전함; 민감한 제품에도 안전함; 유연제; 얼룩 제거제; 찬물 세탁에 적합; 민감성 피부에 적합; 백색 세탁물; 기타
sk-SK: Vlastnosti pracieho prostriedku: Rozjasňovač; Ochrana farby; Koncentrovaný vzorec; Obsahuje enzýmy; Dezinfekčný prostriedok; Bezpečné pre detské oblečenie; Bezpečné pre tmavé farby; Bezpečné pre jemné látky; Zmäkčovač; Odstraňovanie škvŕn; Vhodné na umývanie studenou vodou; Vhodné pre citlivú pokožku; Biela bielizeň; Iné
ru: Характеристики средств для стирки: Осветлитель; Защита цвета; Концентрированная формула; Содержит ферменты; Дезинфицирующее средство; Безопасно для детской одежды; Безопасно для темных цветов; Безопасно для деликатных тканей; Смягчитель; Пятновыводитель; Подходит для стирки в холодной воде; Подходит для чувствительной кожи; Белое белье; Другое
nl: Kenmerken wasmiddel: Brightener; Kleurbescherming; Geconcentreerde formule; Bevat enzymen; Ontsmettingsmiddel; Veilig voor babykleding; Veilig voor donkere kleuren; Veilig voor delicate stoffen; Verzachter; Vlekverwijdering; Geschikt voor wassen met koud water; Geschikt voor de gevoelige huid; Witte was; Andere
zh-TW: 洗衣粉特點: 光亮劑; 色彩保護; 濃縮配方; 含有酵素; 消毒劑; 可安全洗滌嬰兒衣物; 可安全洗滌深色衣物; 可安全洗滌精緻嬰兒衣物; 柔軟精; 去污漬; 適合冷水洗滌; 適用於敏感肌膚; 白色衣物; 其他
en: Laundry detergent features: Brightener; Color protection; Concentrated formula; Contains enzymes; Disinfectant; Safe for baby clothes; Safe for dark colors; Safe for delicates; Softener; Stain removal; Suitable for cold water washing; Suitable for sensitive skin; White laundry; Other
vi: Tính năng giặt tẩy: Chất làm trắng; Giữ màu; Công thức đậm đặc; Chứa enzyme; Thuốc khử trùng; An toàn cho quần áo trẻ em; An toàn với màu tối; An toàn cho đồ nhạy cảm; Nước xả vải; Loại bỏ vết bẩn; Thích hợp giặt nước lạnh; Phù hợp với làn da nhạy cảm; Giặt trắng; Khác
ja: 洗濯洗剤の特徴: ブライトナー; カラープロテクト; 濃縮処方; 酵素含有; 消毒剤; ベビー服にも安心; 濃い色の服にも安全; デリケートな衣類にも安心; 柔軟剤; 汚れ落とし; 冷水での洗濯に最適; 敏感肌に最適; 白い洗濯物; その他
el: Χαρακτηριστικά απορρυπαντικού ρούχων: Φωτιστικό; Προστασία χρώματος; Συμπυκνωμένη φόρμουλα; Περιέχει ένζυμα; Απολυμαντικό; Ασφαλές για βρεφικά ρούχα; Ασφαλές για σκούρα χρώματα; Ασφαλές για ευαίσθητα; Μαλακτικό; Αφαίρεση λεκέδων; Κατάλληλο για πλύσιμο με κρύο νερό; Κατάλληλο για ευαίσθητο δέρμα; Πλύση λευκών; Άλλο
bg-BG: Характеристики на перилния препарат: Изсветлител; Защита на цветовете; Концентрирана формула; Съдържа ензими; Дезинфектант; Безопасен за бебешки дрехи; Безопасен за тъмни цветове; Безопасен за деликатни изделия; Омекотител; Премахване на петна; Подходящ за пране със студена вода; Подходящ за чувствителна кожа; Бяло пране; Други
sl-SI: Lastnosti detergenta za pranje perila: Osvetljevalec; Barvna zaščita; Koncentrirana formula; Vsebuje encime; Razkužilo; Varno za otroška oblačila; Varno za temne barve; Varno za občutljivo perilo; Mehčalec; Odstranjevanje madežev; Primerno za pranje s hladno vodo; Primerno za občutljivo kožo; Belo perilo; Drugo